Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.16.200

Financial statements for shareholders.

(1) Not later than four months after the close of each fiscal year, and in any event prior to the annual meeting of shareholders, each corporation shall prepare (a) a balance sheet showing in reasonable detail the financial condition of the corporation as of the close of its fiscal year, and (b) an income statement showing the results of its operation during its fiscal year. Such statements may be consolidated or combined statements of the corporation and one or more of its subsidiaries, as appropriate. If financial statements are prepared by the corporation for any purpose on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles, the annual statements must also be prepared, and disclose that they are prepared, on that basis. If financial statements are prepared only on a basis other than generally accepted accounting principles, they must be prepared, and disclose that they are prepared, on the same basis as other reports and statements prepared by the corporation for the use of others.

(2) Upon the written request of a shareholder, the corporation shall promptly deliver to the requesting shareholder a copy of the most recent balance sheet and income statement. If prepared for other purposes, the corporation shall also deliver to a requesting shareholder upon the written request of that shareholder a statement of sources and applications of funds, and a statement of changes in shareholders' equity, for the most recent fiscal year.

(3) If the annual financial statements are reported upon by a public accountant, the accountant's report must accompany them. If not, the statements must be accompanied by a statement of the president or the person responsible for the corporation's accounting records:

(a) Stating the person's reasonable belief whether the statements were prepared on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles and, if not, describing the basis of preparation; and

(b) Describing any respects in which the statements were not prepared on a basis of accounting consistent with the basis used for statements prepared for the preceding year.

(4) For purposes of this section, "shareholder" includes a beneficial owner whose shares are held in a voting trust or by a nominee on the beneficial owner's behalf.

[ 2020 c 57 s 76; 2002 c 297 s 47; 1989 c 165 s 186.]